Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2246XC (2) 91 ll/js S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 335.29 Landscape regulation in 1 commercial zones. 2 1. A county shall not adopt or enforce an ordinance, 3 motion, resolution, or amendment that establishes a standard 4 for landscape design including the products, materials, 5 or aesthetic methods that must be used in areas zoned for 6 commercial use. 7 2. This section does not prohibit or diminish the rights 8 of private parties to enact regulations regarding landscape 9 design standards as created by valid private covenants or other 10 contractual agreements among property owners of commercial 11 buildings including but not limited to restrictive covenants, 12 or as otherwise permitted under Iowa law. 13 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 364.10 Landscape regulation in 14 commercial zones. 15 1. A city shall not adopt or enforce an ordinance, 16 motion, resolution, or amendment that establishes a standard 17 for landscape design including the products, materials, 18 or aesthetic methods that must be used in areas zoned for 19 commercial use. 20 2. This section does not prohibit or diminish the rights 21 of private parties to enact regulations regarding landscape 22 design standards as created by valid private covenants or other 23 contractual agreements among property owners of commercial 24 buildings including but not limited to restrictive covenants, 25 or as otherwise permitted under Iowa law. 26